Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-401.09
Veterans' Advisory Commission; duties; meetings.

The Veterans' Advisory Commission shall be empowered to investigate the handling of veterans affairs under the jurisdiction of the Director of Veterans' Affairs, and to make recommendations and report to the Governor or the director on such matters. The commission shall also act as an appeal board, to whom recourse can be had by any individual or post of a recognized veterans organization from any decision made by the Director of Veterans' Affairs or any of his agents or deputies, on a claim for aid from the Nebraska Veterans' Aid Fund. The majority decision of the appeal board shall be final and shall govern in all matters presented to it upon which a hearing is had. The Veterans' Advisory Commission shall meet at least twice each year, or on call of the chairman or three members of the commission.

Laws 1947, c. 306, § 10, p. 931;

Laws 1969, c. 754, § 6, p. 2840.